Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 74.70.060 and 2020 c 354 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Beginning July 1, 2021, and for))For each state fiscal year ((thereafter)), reimbursement for emergency ambulance transports provided by ambulance transport providers shall be increased by application of an add-on to the associated medicaid fee-for-service payment schedule. The add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule under this section shall be calculated by ((June 15, 2021, and shall remain the same for later state fiscal years, to the extent the authority determines federal financial participation is available))the authority annually and be adjusted annually to reflect the available fee amount. The authority shall calculate the projections required by this subsection based on the number of emergency ambulance transports and gross revenue data submitted pursuant to RCW 74.70.040. The fee-for-service add-on shall be equal to the quotient of the available fee amount projected by the authority ((on or before June 15, 2021, for the 2021â22 state))for the previous fiscal year, divided by the total medicaid emergency ambulance transports, projected by the authority ((on or before June 15, 2021, for the 2021â22 state))for the previous fiscal year. The resulting fee-for-service payment schedule amounts after the application of this section shall be equal to the sum of the medicaid fee-for-service payment schedule amount and the add-on increase.(2) The increased payments required by this section shall be funded solely from the following:(a) The quality assurance fee set forth in RCW 74.70.050, along with any interest or other investment income earned on those funds; and(b) Federal reimbursement and any other related federal funds.(3) The proceeds of the quality assurance fee set forth in RCW 74.70.050, the matching amount provided by the federal government, and any interest earned on those proceeds shall be used to supplement, and not to supplant, existing funding for emergency ambulance transports provided by ambulance transport providers.(4) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the authority may seek federal approval to implement any add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule pursuant to this section for any state fiscal year or years, as applicable, on a time-limited basis for a fixed program period, as determined by the authority.Sec. 2. RCW 74.70.050 and 2020 c 354 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning July 1, 2021, and annually thereafter, the authority shall assess each ambulance transport provider a quality assurance fee. Each ambulance transport provider must pay the quality assurance fee on a quarterly basis. The quarterly quality assurance fee payment shall be based on the annual quality assurance fee rate for the applicable state fiscal year multiplied by the number of emergency ambulance transports provided by the ambulance transport provider in the second quarter preceding the state fiscal quarter for which the fee is assessed.(2)(a) ((For the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2021, the annual quality assurance fee rate shall be calculated by multiplying the projected total annual gross receipts for all ambulance transport providers by five and one-half percent, which resulting product shall be divided by the projected total annual emergency ambulance transports by all ambulance transport providers for the state fiscal year.(b))) For state fiscal years beginning July 1, 2022, ((and continuing each state fiscal year thereafter))until June 30, 2026, the quality assurance fee rate shall be calculated by a ratio, the numerator of which shall be the product of the projected aggregate fee schedule amount and the state medical assistance percentage, and the denominator of which shall be ninety percent of the projected total annual emergency ambulance transports by all ambulance transport providers.(((c)))(b) If, during a state fiscal year until June 30, 2026, the actual or projected available fee amount exceeds or is less than the actual or projected aggregate fee schedule amount by more than one percent, the authority shall adjust the annual quality assurance fee rate so that the available fee amount for the state fiscal year is approximately equal to the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year. The available fee amount for a state fiscal year shall be considered to equal the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year if the difference between the available fee amount for the state fiscal year and the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year constitutes less than one percent of the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year.(c) Beginning July 1, 2026, and continuing each state fiscal year thereafter, the annual quality assurance fee rate shall be the rate in effect as of July 4, 2025.(d) If, during a state fiscal year after July 1, 2026, the actual or projected available fee amount exceeds or is less than the actual or projected aggregate fee schedule amount by more than one percent, the authority shall adjust the quality assurance add-on rate so that the available fee amount for the state fiscal year is approximately equal to the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year. The available fee amount for a state fiscal year shall be considered to equal the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year if the difference between the available fee amount for the state fiscal year and the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year constitutes less than one percent of the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year.(3) For each state fiscal year for which the quality assurance fee is assessed, the authority shall send each ambulance transport provider an assessment notice no later than thirty days prior to the beginning of the applicable state fiscal quarter. For each state fiscal quarter for which the quality assurance fee is assessed, the authority shall send to each ambulance transport provider an invoice of the quarterly quality assurance fee payment due for the quarter no later than thirty days before the payment is due. For each state fiscal quarter for which the quality assurance fee is assessed, the ambulance transport provider shall remit payment to the authority by the date established by the authority, which shall be no earlier than fifteen days after the beginning of the applicable state fiscal quarter.(4)(a) Interest shall be assessed on quality assurance fees not paid on the date due at the rate and in the manner provided in RCW 43.20B.695. Interest shall be deposited in the ambulance transport fund established in RCW 74.70.030.(b) In the event that any fee payment is more than sixty days overdue, the authority may deduct the unpaid fee and interest owed from any medicaid reimbursement payments owed to the ambulance transport provider until the full amount of the fee, interest, and any penalties assessed under this chapter are recovered. Any deduction made pursuant to this subsection shall be made only after the authority gives the ambulance transport provider written notification. Any deduction made pursuant to this subsection may be deducted over a period of time that takes into account the financial condition of the ambulance transport provider.(c) In the event that any fee payment is more than sixty days overdue, a penalty equal to the interest charge described in (a) of this subsection shall be assessed and due for each month for which the payment is not received after sixty days. Any funds resulting from a penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the ambulance transport fund established in RCW 74.70.030.(d) The authority may waive a portion or all of either the interest or penalties, or both, assessed under this chapter in the event the authority determines, in its sole discretion, that the ambulance transport provider has demonstrated that imposition of the full amount of the quality assurance fee pursuant to the timelines applicable under this chapter has a high likelihood of creating an undue financial hardship for the provider. Waiver of some or all of the interest or penalties pursuant to this subsection shall be conditioned on the ambulance transport provider's agreement to make fee payments on an alternative schedule developed by the authority.(5) The authority shall accept an ambulance transport provider's payment even if the payment is submitted in a rate year subsequent to the rate year in which the fee was assessed.(6) In the event of a merger, acquisition, or similar transaction involving an ambulance transport provider that has outstanding quality assurance fee payment obligations pursuant to this chapter, including any interest and penalty amounts owed, the resultant or successor ambulance transport provider shall be responsible for paying to the authority the full amount of outstanding quality assurance fee payments, including any applicable interest and penalties, attributable to the ambulance transport provider for which it was assessed, upon the effective date of such transaction. An entity considering a merger, acquisition, or similar transaction involving an ambulance transport provider may submit a request to the authority to ascertain the outstanding quality assurance fee payment obligations of the ambulance transport provider pursuant to this chapter as of the date of the authority's response to that request.Sec. 3. RCW 74.70.020 and 2020 c 354 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Aggregate fee schedule amount" means the product of the add-on calculated pursuant to RCW 74.70.060(1) multiplied by the number of emergency ambulance transports for the state fiscal year.(2) "Ambulance transport provider" means an ambulance transport provider that is licensed under RCW 18.73.140 that bills and receives patient care revenue from the provision of ground emergency ambulance transports. "Ambulance transport provider" does not include a provider that is owned or operated by the state, cities, counties, fire protection districts, regional fire protection service authorities, port districts, public hospital districts, community services districts, health care districts, federally recognized Indian tribes, or any unit of government as defined in 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.50.(3) "Annual quality assurance fee rate" means the quality assurance fee per emergency ambulance transport during each applicable state fiscal year assessed on each ambulance transport provider, which is calculated as a percentage of annual gross revenue for participating ambulance transport providers.(4) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.(5) "Available fee amount" means the sum of the following:(a) The amount deposited in the ambulance transport fund established under RCW 74.70.030 during the applicable state fiscal year, less the amounts described in RCW 74.70.030(3)(a); and(b) Any federal financial participation obtained as a result of the deposit of the amount described in this subsection, for the applicable state fiscal year.(6) "Effective state medical assistance percentage" means a ratio of the aggregate expenditures from state-only sources for medicaid divided by the aggregate expenditures from state and federal sources for medicaid for a state fiscal year.(7) "Emergency ambulance transport" means the act of transporting an individual by use of an ambulance during which a client receives needed emergency medical services en route to an appropriate medical facility. "Emergency ambulance transport" does not include transportation of beneficiaries by passenger cars, taxicabs, litter vans, wheelchair vans, or other forms of public or private conveyances, nor does it include transportation by an air ambulance provider. An "emergency ambulance transport" does not occur when, following evaluation of a patient, a transport is not provided.(8) "Fee-for-service payment schedule" means the payment rates to ambulance transport providers for emergency ambulance transports by the authority without the inclusion of the add-on described in RCW 74.70.060.(9) "Gross receipts" means the total amount of payments received as patient care revenue for emergency ambulance transports, determined on a cash basis of accounting. "Gross receipts" includes all payments received as patient care revenue for emergency ambulance transports from medicaid, medicare, commercial insurance, and all other payers as payment for services rendered.(10) "Medicaid" means the medical assistance program and the state children's health insurance program as established in ((Title XIX and Title XXI))Titles XIX and XXI of the social security act, respectively, and as administered in the state of Washington by the authority.(11) "Program" means the ambulance quality assurance fee program established in this chapter.--- END ---